Illinois, session 104th, HB1381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regional Fire Protection Agency Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 741/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Regional Fire Protection Agency Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-1095, eff. 8-26-14.)